Missouri, session 2026, SB1768.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1 Section A. Section 173.2655, RSMo, is repealed and one
2 new section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section
3 173.2655, to read as follows:
1 173.2655. 1. This section and section 173.2660 shall
2 be known and may be cited as the "Public Safety Recruitment
3 and Retention Act".
4 2. For purposes of this section and section 173.2660,
5 unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the
6 following terms mean:
7 (1) "Advanced emergency medical technician", as such
8 term is defined in section 190.100;
9 (2) "Department", the department of higher education
10 and workforce development;
11 (3) "Emergency medical technician", as such term is
12 defined in section 190.100;
13 (4) "Firefighter", any officer, member, or employee of
14 a fire department, fire protection district, or other fire-
15 fighting organization of a political subdivision who is
16 employed for the purpose of fighting fires, [excluding
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1768 2
17 volunteer firefighters] and anyone employed in a clerical or
18 other capacity not involving fire-fighting duties;
19 (5) "Institution of higher education", a public
20 community college, state college, or state university
21 located in Missouri; or an approved private institution, as
22 such term is defined in section 173.1102, that chooses to
23 accept any tuition award money pursuant to subdivision (2)
24 of subsection 7 of this section; or an emergency medical
25 services training entity accredited or certified by the
26 Missouri department of health and senior services pursuant
27 to the provisions of section 190.131;
28 (6) "Legal dependent", as such term is defined by the
29 United States Department of Education for purposes of the
30 Free Application for Federal Student Aid;
31 (7) "Line of duty", any action that public safety
32 personnel is authorized or obligated by law, rule, or
33 regulation to perform, related to or as a condition of
34 employment or service;
35 (8) "Open seat", a vacant position in a class, course,
36 or program that is available for enrollment, and which may
37 become available when a student drops out or transfers, or
38 when a class, course, or program has unused capacity,
39 allowing new students to register or enroll;
40 (9) "Paramedic", as such term is defined in section
41 190.100;
42 (10) "Police officer", any person who, by virtue of
43 office or public employment, is vested by law with the power
44 and duty to make arrests for violation of the laws of the
45 state of Missouri or ordinances of any municipality thereof,
46 while acting within the scope of his or her authority as an
47 employee of a public law enforcement agency, as such term is
48 defined in section 590.1040;

SB 1768 3
49 (11) "Public safety personnel", includes any police
50 officer, firefighter, paramedic, telecommunicator first
51 responder, emergency medical technician, or advanced
52 emergency medical technician who is trained and authorized
53 by law or rule to render emergency medical assistance or
54 treatment;
55 (12) "Telecommunicator first responder", as such term
56 is defined in section 650.320;
57 (13) "Tuition", the charges and cost of tuition as set
58 by the governing body of an institution of higher education,
59 including fees such as course fees, activity fees,
60 technology fees, and mandatory fees charged by such
61 institution to all full-time students as a condition of
62 enrollment, but excluding the costs of room, board, books,
63 and any other educational materials, equipment, or supplies.
64 3. Subject to appropriation, public safety personnel
65 with at least six years of service shall be entitled to an
66 award worth up to one hundred percent of the resident
67 tuition charges of an institution of higher education if the
68 individual:
69 (1) Possesses one of the following:
70 (a) A current, valid license issued by the department
71 of health and senior services authorizing such person to
72 serve as an emergency medical technician, advanced emergency
73 medical technician, or paramedic;
74 (b) A current, valid license issued by the peace
75 officer standards and training commission authorizing such
76 person to serve as a peace officer pursuant to the
77 provisions of chapter 590;
78 (c) A current, valid certificate issued by the
79 division of fire safety authorizing such person to serve as
80 a firefighter; or

SB 1768 4
81 (d) A current, valid certificate confirming successful
82 completion of any ongoing training requirements pursuant to
83 section 650.340; and
84 (e) For all public safety personnel, a certificate of
85 verification signed by the individual's supervisor or
86 employer verifying that such individual is currently
87 employed full-time as public safety personnel and trained
88 and authorized by law or rule to render emergency medical
89 assistance or treatment;
90 (2) Meets all admission requirements of the
91 institution of higher education;
92 (3) Has not already earned a baccalaureate degree;
93 (4) Pursues studies leading to a license or
94 certification issued by a training entity accredited or
95 certified pursuant to the provisions of section 190.131, an
96 associate degree or baccalaureate degree in one of the
97 following academic subject areas:
98 (a) For police officers, eligible subjects include
99 forensic science, fisheries and wildlife, political science,
100 psychology, history, philosophy, sociology, anthropology,
101 global studies, Spanish, journalism, advertising, public
102 relations, nutrition and health sciences, communication
103 sciences and disorders, and criminal justice;
104 (b) For firefighters, paramedics, emergency medical
105 technicians, and advanced emergency medical technicians,
106 eligible subjects include biology, chemistry, biochemistry,
107 microbiology, nutrition and health sciences, communication
108 sciences and disorders, Spanish, advertising, public
109 relations, paramedicine, fire science, fire technology, fire
110 administration, fire management, communications, homeland
111 security, emergency management, disaster management, and
112 crisis management; and

SB 1768 5
113 (c) For telecommunicator first responders, eligible
114 subjects include any subject specified in paragraph (a) or
115 (b) of this subdivision;
116 (5) Submits verification of the professional license
117 or certificate and the certificate of verification required
118 by subdivision (1) of this subsection to the department, in
119 a form and manner as prescribed by the department;
120 (6) Files with the department documentation showing
121 proof of employment as public safety personnel and proof of
122 residence in Missouri each year such individual or such
123 individual's legal dependent applies for and receives the
124 tuition award;
125 (7) First applies for all other forms of federal and
126 state student financial aid before applying for a tuition
127 award, including, but not limited to, filing the United
128 States Department of Education Free Application for Federal
129 Student Aid and, if applicable, applying for financial
130 assistance pursuant to the provisions of 38 U.S.C. Section
131 3301, et seq.; and
132 (8) Submits a document to the department confirming
133 that the public safety personnel has satisfied the
134 provisions of subdivision (7) of this subsection, to be
135 submitted in a form and manner as prescribed by the
136 department.
137 4. Public safety personnel may receive the tuition
138 award pursuant to subsection 3 of this section for up to
139 five years if they otherwise continue to be eligible for the
140 tuition award. The five years of tuition award eligibility
141 starts once the individual applies for and receives the
142 tuition award for the first time and is available to such
143 individual for the next five consecutive years or the

SB 1768 6
144 individual's achievement of one hundred twenty credit hours,
145 whichever occurs first.
146 5. Subject to appropriation, a legal dependent of
147 public safety personnel with at least ten years of service
148 shall be entitled to a tuition award worth up to one hundred
149 percent of the resident tuition charges of an institution of
150 higher education for an associate or baccalaureate degree
151 program if such public safety personnel satisfies the
152 provisions of subdivisions (1), (5), and (6) of subsection 3
153 of this section and the legal dependent:
154 (1) Executes an agreement with the department in
155 accordance with the provisions of section 173.2660;
156 (2) Has not previously earned a baccalaureate degree;
157 (3) Meets all admission requirements of the
158 institution of higher education;
159 (4) First applies for all other forms of federal and
160 state student financial aid before applying for a tuition
161 award, including, but not limited to, filing the United
162 States Department of Education Free Application for Federal
163 Student Aid and, if applicable, applying for financial
164 assistance pursuant to the provisions of 38 U.S.C. Section
165 3301, et seq.;
166 (5) Submits a document to the department confirming
167 that the legal dependent has satisfied subdivision (4) of
168 this subsection, to be submitted in a form and manner as
169 prescribed by the department;
170 (6) Submits the verification required pursuant to
171 subsection 8 of this section to the department; and
172 (7) Pursues studies leading to a license or
173 certification issued by a training entity accredited or
174 certified pursuant to the provisions of section 190.131, an
175 associate degree or baccalaureate degree in any one of the

SB 1768 7
176 subject areas specified in paragraphs (a) to (c) of
177 subdivision (4) of subsection 3 of this section.
178 6. A legal dependent may receive the tuition award for
179 up to five years if the public safety personnel and the
180 legal dependent continue to be eligible for such tuition
181 award. The five years of tuition award eligibility starts
182 once the legal dependent applies for and receives the
183 tuition award for the first time and is available to such
184 legal dependent for the next five consecutive years or the
185 legal dependent's achievement of one hundred twenty credit
186 hours, whichever occurs first.
187 7. The tuition award shall be worth:
188 (1) Up to one hundred percent of the public safety
189 personnel's or the legal dependent's tuition remaining due
190 after subtracting awarded federal financial aid grants and
191 state scholarships and grants for the eligible public safety
192 personnel or legal dependent during the time the public
193 safety personnel or legal dependent is enrolled. To remain
194 eligible, the public safety personnel or legal dependent
195 shall comply with all requirements of the institution for
196 continued attendance and award of an associate degree or a
197 baccalaureate degree; or
198 (2) In the case of tuition at an approved private
199 institution, up to one hundred percent of the public safety
200 personnel's or the legal dependent's tuition remaining due
201 after subtracting awarded federal financial aid grants and
202 state scholarships and grants for the eligible public safety
203 personnel or legal dependent during the time the public
204 safety personnel or legal dependent is enrolled, up to a
205 maximum amount that is equal to the total cost of tuition
206 and mandatory fees charged to a Missouri resident at the
207 public community college, state college, or state university

SB 1768 8
208 with the highest combined tuition and mandatory fee cost in
209 the state at the time a tuition grant is awarded, as
210 determined by the department. A private institution that
211 chooses to accept as a tuition payment any tuition award
212 money pursuant to this subdivision shall not charge the
213 recipient of the tuition award any tuition that exceeds the
214 maximum combined tuition and mandatory fee cost as
215 determined by the department prior to the application of the
216 tuition award.
217 8. (1) An application for a tuition award shall
218 include a verification of the public safety personnel's
219 satisfaction of the requirements of subdivisions (1), (5),
220 and (6) of subsection 3 of this section. The public safety
221 personnel shall include such verification when he or she or
222 his or her legal dependent is applying to the department for
223 a tuition waiver.
224 (2) The death of public safety personnel in the line
225 of duty which occurs after submission of an application for
226 a tuition award shall not disqualify such individual's
227 otherwise eligible legal dependent from receiving the
228 tuition award. In such case, in lieu of submitting the
229 certificate of verification provided for in subdivision (1)
230 of this subsection, the legal dependent shall submit a
231 statement attesting that:
232 (a) At the time of death, such public safety personnel
233 satisfied the requirements of subdivision (1) of this
234 subsection; and
235 (b) Such public safety personnel died in the line of
236 duty.
237 9. The department shall provide a tuition award to
238 public safety personnel and legal dependents who satisfy the
239 provisions of this section and section 173.2660, if

SB 1768 9
240 applicable, and apply for an open seat at an institution of
241 higher education, but shall not provide a tuition award if
242 doing so would require the institution to create additional
243 seats exceeding class, course, or program capacity.
244 10. All applicants for a tuition award shall submit
245 their applications to the department no later than December
246 fifteenth annually. No later than March first annually, the
247 department shall send written notice of the applicant's
248 eligibility or ineligibility for the tuition award and state
249 whether the application has been approved or denied. If the
250 applicant is determined not to be eligible for the tuition
251 award, the notice shall include the reason or reasons for
252 such determination. If the application is denied, the
253 notice shall include the reason or reasons for the denial.
254 11. The department shall promulgate rules to implement
255 the provisions of this section and section 173.2660. Any
256 rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in
257 section 536.010, that is created under the authority
258 delegated in this section shall become effective only if it
259 complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of
260 chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This
261 section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the
262 powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
263 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove
264 and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional,
265 then the grant of rulemaking authority and any rule proposed
266 or adopted after August 28, 2025, shall be invalid and void.
267 12. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury
268 the "Public Safety Recruitment and Retention Fund", which
269 shall consist of moneys appropriated by the general assembly
270 or any gifts, donations, or bequests for the purpose of
271 implementing the provisions of this section and section

SB 1768 10
272 173.2660. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the
273 fund. In accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180, the
274 state treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall
275 be a dedicated fund and money in the fund shall be used
276 solely by the department of higher education and workforce
277 development for the purpose of granting tuition awards as
278 provided in this section and section 173.2660.
279 (2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080
280 to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end
281 of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
282 general revenue fund.
283 (3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the
284 fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any
285 interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
286 credited to the fund.
287 13. In any year in which moneys in the public safety
288 recruitment and retention fund are insufficient to fully
289 fund tuition awards for all eligible applicants, tuition
290 awards shall be awarded in the following order of priority;
291 provided that, in the event of a tie in eligibility,
292 available funds shall be distributed on a pro rata basis:
293 (1) Priority class one shall include public safety
294 personnel, in the following order:
295 (a) Public safety personnel in departments located
296 wholly or partially in counties or cities not within a
297 county with the highest crime rate per capita, as determined
298 by the most recent uniform crime reporting statistics from
299 the Federal Bureau of Investigation; and
300 (b) Public safety personnel with the most years of
301 service; and
302 (2) Priority class two shall include dependents of
303 public safety personnel, in the following order:

SB 1768 11
304 (a) Dependents of public safety personnel in
305 departments located wholly or partially in counties or
306 cities not within a county with the highest crime rate per
307 capita, as determined by the most recent uniform crime
308 reporting statistics from the Federal Bureau of
309 Investigation; and
310 (b) Dependents of public safety personnel with the
311 most years of service.
312 14. The tuition awards provided for in this section
313 and section 173.2660 are subject to appropriation. If there
314 are no moneys in the fund established in subsection 12 of
315 this section, no tuition awards shall be granted.
✓